lib/vendor/dicts/en_EN.aff
FLAG num
SFX 685 Y 1
SFX 685 0 lla's .
SFX 4707 Y 1
SFX 4707 0 rents .
SFX 362 Y 1
SFX 362 0 ger's .
SFX 1684 Y 1
SFX 1684 0 point's .
SFX 2510 Y 1
SFX 2510 0 fied .
SFX 3806 Y 1
SFX 3806 0 rest's .
SFX 3440 Y 1
SFX 3440 0 fier .
SFX 2225 Y 1
SFX 2225 0 fies .
SFX 2905 Y 1
SFX 2905 0 face's .
SFX 3049 Y 1
SFX 3049 0 urations .
SFX 4208 Y 1
SFX 4208 0 eman's .
SFX 2909 Y 1
SFX 2909 0 erville .
SFX 3019 Y 1
SFX 3019 0 worthinesses .
SFX 1870 Y 1
SFX 1870 0 ric's .
SFX 4637 Y 1
SFX 4637 0 sages .
SFX 810 Y 1
SFX 810 0 nings .
SFX 2830 Y 1
SFX 2830 0 ket's .
SFX 534 Y 1
SFX 534 0 fish .
SFX 2852 Y 1
SFX 2852 0 imeters .
SFX 3980 Y 1
SFX 3980 0 llings .
SFX 716 Y 1
SFX 716 0 hood's .
SFX 4199 Y 1
SFX 4199 0 eously .
SFX 4116 Y 1
SFX 4116 0 ibleness's .
SFX 753 Y 1
SFX 753 0 ent's .
SFX 3186 Y 1
SFX 3186 0 ressiveness .
SFX 1729 Y 1
SFX 1729 0 lander .
SFX 1250 Y 1
SFX 1250 0 dom's .
SFX 3285 Y 1
SFX 3285 0 nally .
SFX 4610 Y 1
SFX 4610 0 sheets .
SFX 1193 Y 1
SFX 1193 0 tle's .
SFX 3457 Y 1
SFX 3457 0 erted .
SFX 4023 Y 1
SFX 4023 0 lander's .
SFX 3567 Y 1
SFX 3567 0 -life .
SFX 2636 Y 1
SFX 2636 0 tree's .
SFX 1018 Y 1
SFX 1018 0 ics's .
SFX 1822 Y 1
SFX 1822 0 ver's .
SFX 2024 Y 1
SFX 2024 0 cap's .
SFX 4227 Y 1
SFX 4227 0 dily .
SFX 2750 Y 1
SFX 2750 0 ooning .
SFX 2742 Y 1
SFX 2742 0 osition's .
SFX 178 Y 1
SFX 178 0 ding .
SFX 469 Y 1
SFX 469 0 ishly .
SFX 2017 Y 1
SFX 2017 0 cloths .
SFX 2998 Y 1
SFX 2998 0 -line .
SFX 4187 Y 1
SFX 4187 0 ernesses .
SFX 3494 Y 1
SFX 3494 0 dingly .
SFX 1352 Y 1
SFX 1352 0 ately .
SFX 1892 Y 1
SFX 1892 0 ometer .
SFX 821 Y 1
SFX 821 0 eners .
SFX 3097 Y 1
SFX 3097 0 teries .
SFX 4778 Y 1
SFX 4778 0 orters .
SFX 4085 Y 1
SFX 4085 0 igning .
SFX 4794 Y 1
SFX 4794 0 ophone .
SFX 1238 Y 1
SFX 1238 0 il's .
SFX 4881 Y 1
SFX 4881 0 nea's .
SFX 3511 Y 1
SFX 3511 0 ciousness .
SFX 3550 Y 1
SFX 3550 0 ane's .
SFX 1839 Y 1
SFX 1839 0 to's .
SFX 378 Y 1
SFX 378 0 woman's .
SFX 4344 Y 1
SFX 4344 0 yans .
SFX 371 Y 1
SFX 371 0 houses .
SFX 2760 Y 1
SFX 2760 0 ologically .
SFX 214 Y 1
SFX 214 0 ey's .
SFX 3341 Y 1
SFX 3341 0 ivism .
SFX 51 Y 1
SFX 51 0 ingly .
SFX 3340 Y 1
SFX 3340 0 ivist .
SFX 1349 Y 1
SFX 1349 0 bier .
SFX 1620 Y 1
SFX 1620 0 bies .
SFX 2874 Y 1
SFX 2874 0 ialness .
SFX 922 Y 1
SFX 922 0 yard .
SFX 1471 Y 1
SFX 1471 0 holder's .
SFX 4430 Y 1
SFX 4430 0 ualness's .
SFX 660 Y 1
SFX 660 0 sa's .
SFX 1633 Y 1
SFX 1633 0 z's .
SFX 2506 Y 1
SFX 2506 0 gered .
SFX 4744 Y 1
SFX 4744 0 pointed .
SFX 3472 Y 1
SFX 3472 0 enter's .
SFX 4453 Y 1
SFX 4453 0 tracts .
SFX 126 Y 1
SFX 126 0 ization .
SFX 114 Y 1
SFX 114 0 on's .
SFX 3431 Y 1
SFX 3431 0 gate's .
SFX 2131 Y 1
SFX 2131 0 plane's .
SFX 644 Y 1
SFX 644 0 giest .
SFX 3862 Y 1
SFX 3862 0 orization .
SFX 1245 Y 1
SFX 1245 0 eless .
SFX 2491 Y 1
SFX 2491 0 heartedness .
SFX 3126 Y 1
SFX 3126 0 station .
SFX 4695 Y 1
SFX 4695 0 rices .
SFX 1317 Y 1
SFX 1317 0 iting .
SFX 2047 Y 1
SFX 2047 0 -class .
SFX 4946 Y 1
SFX 4946 0 lus's .
SFX 4788 Y 1
SFX 4788 0 orations .
SFX 2183 Y 1
SFX 2183 0 kle .
SFX 2182 Y 1
SFX 2182 0 kly .
SFX 1477 Y 1
SFX 1477 0 ging's .
SFX 2717 Y 1
SFX 2717 0 ressions .
SFX 2648 Y 1
SFX 2648 0 the's .
SFX 4073 Y 1
SFX 4073 0 ini's .
SFX 1603 Y 1
SFX 1603 0 ented .
SFX 1776 Y 1
SFX 1776 0 enter .
SFX 2837 Y 1
SFX 2837 0 itive .
SFX 3589 Y 1
SFX 3589 0 wash .
SFX 527 Y 1
SFX 527 0 up's .
SFX 795 Y 1
SFX 795 0 cher's .
SFX 313 Y 1
SFX 313 0 ways .
SFX 3830 Y 1
SFX 3830 0 pread .
SFX 4098 Y 1
SFX 4098 0 iders .
SFX 4419 Y 1
SFX 4419 0 uction's .
SFX 3555 Y 1
SFX 3555 0 aining .
SFX 3993 Y 1
SFX 3993 0 linguistic .
SFX 225 Y 1
SFX 225 0 el's .
SFX 3889 Y 1
SFX 3889 0 nuclear .
SFX 2622 Y 1
SFX 2622 0 uals .
SFX 1089 Y 1
SFX 1089 0 hole's .
SFX 4456 Y 1
SFX 4456 0 traction's .
SFX 2314 Y 1
SFX 2314 0 tless .
SFX 2960 Y 1
SFX 2960 0 ay's .
SFX 4186 Y 1
SFX 4186 0 ership's .
SFX 467 Y 1
SFX 467 0 m's .
SFX 3506 Y 1
SFX 3506 0 crafts .
SFX 4440 Y 1
SFX 4440 0 ualisation .
SFX 1949 Y 1
SFX 1949 0 iled .
SFX 4428 Y 1
SFX 4428 0 uary .
SFX 1162 Y 1
SFX 1162 0 iles .
SFX 1375 Y 1
SFX 1375 0 tation .
SFX 1650 Y 1
SFX 1650 0 tock .
SFX 2304 Y 1
SFX 2304 0 uate .
SFX 1124 Y 1
SFX 1124 0 somely .
SFX 1551 Y 1
SFX 1551 0 ography's .
SFX 2227 Y 1
SFX 2227 0 eyed .
SFX 3140 Y 1
SFX 3140 0 sively .
SFX 4634 Y 1
SFX 4634 0 sails .
SFX 2696 Y 1
SFX 2696 0 sack .
SFX 3775 Y 1
SFX 3775 0 rter's .
SFX 1632 Y 1
SFX 1632 0 zed .
SFX 2588 Y 1
SFX 2588 0 zer .
SFX 1108 Y 1
SFX 1108 0 zes .
SFX 4639 Y 1
SFX 4639 0 sage .
SFX 3400 Y 1
SFX 3400 0 ialists .
SFX 4636 Y 1
SFX 4636 0 sail .
SFX 2919 Y 1
SFX 2919 0 encing .
SFX 1332 Y 1
SFX 1332 0 ham's .
SFX 4463 Y 1
SFX 4463 0 tous .
SFX 1303 Y 1
SFX 1303 0 oned .
SFX 2757 Y 1
SFX 2757 0 oner .
SFX 2755 Y 1
SFX 2755 0 ones .
SFX 446 Y 1
SFX 446 0 town .
SFX 4804 Y 1
SFX 4804 0 ongs .
SFX 3944 Y 1
SFX 3944 0 mistress .
SFX 2754 Y 1
SFX 2754 0 onia .
SFX 1302 Y 1
SFX 1302 0 onic .
SFX 4479 Y 1
SFX 4479 0 tised .
SFX 3076 Y 1
SFX 3076 0 tises .
SFX 2821 Y 1
SFX 2821 0 laying .
SFX 4955 Y 1
SFX 4955 0 locations .
SFX 3218 Y 1
SFX 3218 0 posed .
SFX 4741 Y 1
SFX 4741 0 poser .
SFX 3217 Y 1
SFX 3217 0 poses .
SFX 4660 Y 1
SFX 4660 0 rode .
SFX 1817 Y 1
SFX 1817 0 writer .
SFX 4347 Y 1
SFX 4347 0 writes .
SFX 3479 Y 1
SFX 3479 0 elessly .
SFX 4069 Y 1
SFX 4069 0 ionisms .
SFX 2351 Y 1
SFX 2351 0 saws .
SFX 2083 Y 1
SFX 2083 0 tedly .
SFX 3788 Y 1
SFX 3788 0 roll .
SFX 1142 Y 1
SFX 1142 0 meters .
SFX 2354 Y 1
SFX 2354 0 rons .
SFX 1501 Y 1
SFX 1501 0 bel's .
SFX 1725 Y 1
SFX 1725 0 lessness' .
SFX 355 Y 1
SFX 355 0 al's .
SFX 1309 Y 1
SFX 1309 0 mate's .
SFX 3122 Y 1
SFX 3122 0 stroke's .
SFX 1167 Y 1
SFX 1167 0 ford's .
SFX 4560 Y 1
SFX 4560 0 stage .
SFX 2172 Y 1
SFX 2172 0 lo's .
SFX 2020 Y 1
SFX 2020 0 chiest .
SFX 1874 Y 1
SFX 1874 0 rations .
SFX 1246 Y 1
SFX 1246 0 eled .
SFX 3481 Y 1
SFX 3481 0 eler .
SFX 3664 Y 1
SFX 3664 0 tiveness .
SFX 710 Y 1
SFX 710 0 ka's .
SFX 3960 Y 1
SFX 3960 0 mal .
SFX 69 Y 1
SFX 69 0 man .
SFX 1914 Y 1
SFX 1914 0 ming's .
SFX 1713 Y 1
SFX 1713 0 mar .
SFX 1711 Y 1
SFX 1711 0 mas .
SFX 4936 Y 1
SFX 4936 0 mat .
SFX 3476 Y 1
SFX 3476 0 elia .
SFX 2700 Y 1
SFX 2700 0 rying .
SFX 3199 Y 1
SFX 3199 0 ralized .
SFX 3198 Y 1
SFX 3198 0 ralizes .
SFX 1341 Y 1
SFX 1341 0 dering .
SFX 4286 Y 1
SFX 4286 0 ayed .
SFX 4285 Y 1
SFX 4285 0 ayer .
SFX 237 Y 1
SFX 237 0 med .
SFX 90 Y 1
SFX 90 0 men .
SFX 2369 Y 1
SFX 2369 0 prints .
SFX 409 Y 1
SFX 409 0 mer .
SFX 1561 Y 1
SFX 1561 0 mes .
SFX 2865 Y 1
SFX 2865 0 icular .
SFX 4742 Y 1
SFX 4742 0 poke .
SFX 868 Y 1
SFX 868 0 antly .
SFX 376 Y 1
SFX 376 0 ability's .
SFX 2819 Y 1
SFX 2819 0 leigh's .
SFX 3950 Y 1
SFX 3950 0 mic .
SFX 951 Y 1
SFX 951 0 mie .
SFX 1913 Y 1
SFX 1913 0 mit .
SFX 1738 Y 1
SFX 1738 0 iness' .
SFX 3026 Y 1
SFX 3026 0 wardness .
SFX 3486 Y 1
SFX 3486 0 edest .
SFX 3549 Y 1
SFX 3549 0 antry .
SFX 1691 Y 1
SFX 1691 0 pable .
SFX 1104 Y 1
SFX 1104 0 bones .
SFX 3219 Y 1
SFX 3219 0 pose .
SFX 1877 Y 1
SFX 1877 0 post .
SFX 3942 Y 1
SFX 3942 0 mon .
SFX 2473 Y 1
SFX 2473 0 iling .
SFX 3156 Y 1
SFX 3156 0 scopes .
SFX 1763 Y 1
SFX 1763 0 going .
SFX 1984 Y 1
SFX 1984 0 eration's .
SFX 4991 Y 1
SFX 4991 0 legged .
SFX 156 Y 1
SFX 156 0 ering .
SFX 3761 Y 1
SFX 3761 0 scopic .
SFX 3937 Y 1
SFX 3937 0 mus .
SFX 653 Y 1
SFX 653 0 alness .
SFX 1586 Y 1
SFX 1586 0 ility .
SFX 1688 Y 1
SFX 1688 0 piness .
SFX 3590 Y 1
SFX 3590 0 wardness's .
SFX 4013 Y 1
SFX 4013 0 lected .
SFX 3821 Y 1
SFX 3821 0 rage's .
SFX 1769 Y 1
SFX 1769 0 falls .
SFX 2726 Y 1
SFX 2726 0 ralization .
SFX 3216 Y 1
SFX 3216 0 posing .
SFX 368 Y 1
SFX 368 0 nie's .
SFX 981 Y 1
SFX 981 0 -up's .
SFX 4830 Y 1
SFX 4830 0 ody's .
SFX 4645 Y 1
SFX 4645 0 runner .
SFX 556 Y 1
SFX 556 0 lle's .
SFX 4425 Y 1
SFX 4425 0 uces .
SFX 4551 Y 1
SFX 4551 0 stream's .
SFX 289 Y 1
SFX 289 0 ner's .
SFX 1547 Y 1
SFX 1547 0 ora's .
SFX 3983 Y 1
SFX 3983 0 ller's .
SFX 2765 Y 1
SFX 2765 0 ock's .
SFX 3375 Y 1
SFX 3375 0 ights .
SFX 2095 Y 1
SFX 2095 0 space .
SFX 4850 Y 1
SFX 4850 0 nora .
