lib/vendor/dicts/en_EN.dic
Ford/1,123,749,1332,1669,2909,3709,4556
Ste/1,83,215,416,590,685,2001,2235,2600,2684,2685,2920,3592,4362,4669,4872
bas/2,3,4,8,9,16,21,25,26,28,38,43,48,57,63,76,82,97,116,119,127,140,147,148,182,191,200,209,213,220,227,254,259,401,436,447,458,479,499,500,504,505,513,594,620,621,622,646,658,788,817,820,961,1082,1094,1201,1238,1245,1294,1458,1472,2347,2674,2829,2830,2831,2921,2924,3474,3726,4207,4208,4481,4542
defog/2,131,135,276,362,402
div/2,3,4,8,9,12,14,16,21,29,30,32,33,38,124,162,194,217,278,352,548,593,839,910,1062,1082,1160,1324,1335,1416,1589,1599,1739,1945,1946,1947,1959,2201,2480,2520,2522,2910,3361,3456,3457,3592,4098,4362
dog/1,2,8,16,21,31,37,53,61,131,135,249,319,371,400,448,534,597,644,645,709,728,819,965,966,1068,1241,1710,1711,2216,2884,2900,2901,3439,3522,3571,3956,4155,4257,4333,4334,4468,4990,4991,4992
fly/3,9,12,14,29,35,287,313,339,379,612,651,809,998,1032,1356,1514,2053,3024,3025,3232,3233,3584,3746,3850,4014,4610
foot/1,2,3,4,9,12,14,29,32,46,50,53,69,78,90,112,167,169,185,195,198,300,350,356,629,639,694,717,724,934,1056,1200,1221,1409,1515,1596,1679,1687,1769,1770,2208,2287,2369,2370,2487,2488,2696,2878,2946,3123,3124,3211,3231,3539,3540,3805,3806,3852,3895,4761,4762,4768,4848
gas/1,8,149,356,380,401,447,479,500,594,620,621,622,639,663,745,779,782,817,837,886,977,1087,1179,1239,1262,1466,1549,1892,2814,2829,2830,2831,2880,3142,3143,3468,3734,3736,4197,4198,4199
grandpa/2,4707
harp/1,2,3,4,9,12,14,18,29,31,32,37,59,67,73,1418,1695,1696,2343,2750,2751,4797
main/1,2,5,69,76,273,360,430,876,928,1315,1435,1522,1722,1729,2439,2440,2445,3136,3723,4023,4550,4551,4569,4634,4635,4636
martyr/1,2,3,4,791,1099,1250
met/2,3,4,8,9,12,14,16,28,30,34,92,137,152,156,355,599,608,634,696,746,768,797,889,890,931,937,979,980,1181,1193,1204,1627,1807,1870,3167,3181,4696
mill/55,60,62,167,185,463,507,561,569,2470,2592,2593,2852,2853,3706,4349,4550,4551
mys/3097,3477
needle/300,340,341,350,356,378,941,1133,1274,1684,2011,2012
orphan/1,2,3,4,167,185,195,625,716
overbid/2,178
pit/1,2,18,30,31,33,34,37,48,57,69,78,101,114,116,149,194,230,298,322,327,370,373,395,447,471,472,479,493,500,562,692,746,795,1330,1344,1596,1658,1757,1758,1769,1770,1847,2206,2330,2879,3407,3468,3515,3577,4197,4198,4199
pre/2,31,82,209,224,237,285,292,296,297,331,367,395,517,535,647,719,807,829,833,1201,1226,1294,1814,1927,2282,2328,2346,2369,2370,2509,2513,2590,2897,2904,2905,2933,3099,3144,3211,3213,3435,3436,3448,3511,3512,3613,3827,3828,3831,3964,3975,4234,4248,4592,4637,4638,4738,4755,4760,4921,4948,4949
pro/1,6,27,117,250,262,283,285,331,421,453,467,517,719,994,1058,1093,1116,1226,1298,1403,1404,1765,1902,2043,2211,2212,2374,2402,2500,2731,2732,2934,3213,3216,3217,3218,3219,3229,3230,3499,3500,3567,3831,3841,3842,3889,4154,4741,4873,4921,4953
quanti/88,153,157,261,301,691,1594,2225,2508,2510,3440,3441,4156
rave/2,6,7,13,15,19,27,40,46,49,52,71,96,151,159,160,210,326,577,619,810,854,1012,1145,1236,3980,4072,4075
refer/35,179,184,482,753,992,1208,1536,2123
semi/1,2,408,495,553,586,638,1000,1305,2164,3285,4816
shut/2,48,332,388,529,600,632,634,649,738,768,822,930,931,1024,1193,1270,1552,2581,4166,4167
spin/2,8,16,18,21,25,28,34,36,56,72,137,145,151,171,197,210,211,289,357,451,516,519,589,632,776,792,810,912,970,971,1037,1129,1173,1245,1629,1656,1680,1787,2362,2652,2720,2924,3478,3479,3796,3812,4327,4527,4689,4725
supp/3,4,5,9,12,14,46,49,52,88,121,152,153,156,232,389,497,587,607,664,999,1401,1402,1544,1545,1693,1694,1715,1889,2441,2716,2717,2718,2719,2741,2742,2743,2744,2745,2746,3049,3050,3051,3186,3238,3324,3325,3327,3333,3334,3824,3859,3995,3996,3997,3998,3999,4000,4001,4011,4778,4779,4988,4989
syllabi/1,2225,2508,2510
tang/1,2,3,4,5,18,34,36,37,46,52,68,88,94,125,153,232,236,270,324,431,482,667,753,855,1021,1088,1138,1152,1217,1229,1328,1337,1934,2185,2205,2233,2531,2832,3396,4116
trust/1,2,3,4,9,12,18,31,34,36,37,51,56,72,108,165,177,205,229,240,255,384,2004,2050,2594,3019,3020,3485
uni/187,202,1211,1494,1594,1638,1665,2225,2368,2508,2510,3440,3441,3613,4156,4243,4733,4738
